Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.370

Transfer of certain Lake Union shorelands to university.

Block 18-A, Second Supplemental Maps of Lake Union Shore Lands, as shown on the official maps thereof on file in the office of the commissioner of public lands, is hereby transferred to the University of Washington and shall be held and used for university purposes only.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.370. Prior: 1963 c 71 s 1. Formerly RCW 28.77.339.]